Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.140

Action by person under eighteen years.

Except as provided under RCW 7.105.100, no action shall be commenced by any person under the age of eighteen years, except by his guardian, or until a next friend for such a person shall have been appointed. Whenever requested, the justice shall appoint some suitable person, who shall consent thereto in writing, to be named by such plaintiff, to act as his or her next friend in such action, who shall be responsible for the costs therein.

[ 2022 c 268 s 34; 2021 c 215 s 127; 1992 c 111 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 75; Code 1881 s 1753; 1873 p 343 s 52; 1854 p 230 s 40; RRS s 1771.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—1992 c 111: See note following RCW 4.08.050.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.